California, session 20252026, AB1414.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1942.8 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1942.8. (a) For any residential tenancy commenced, renewed, or continuing on a month-to-month or other periodic basis, on or after January 1, 2026, a landlord or their agent shall allow the tenant to opt out of paying for any subscription from a third-party internet service provider, such as through a bulk-billing arrangement, to provide service for wired internet, cellular, or satellite service that is offered in connection with the tenancy.(b) A landlord or their agent shall not retaliate against a tenant for exercising the tenant’s rights under this section, consistent with the protections provided in Section 1942.5.(c) If the landlord or their agent violates subdivision (a), the tenant may deduct the cost of the subscription to the third-party internet service provider from the rent.(d) This section does not prevent a landlord or their agent from offering bulk-billing arrangements to their tenants.(e) For the purposes of this section, “internet service provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 3100.